Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 2. Commitments, Programs, and Furloughs.

Sec. 33.30.050.
Commissioner to provide medical services. [Repealed,
§ 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.051.
Commitment to commissioner.

A person convicted of an offense against the state shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner for the term of imprisonment that the court directs.

A person restrained under AS

26.05.400

or convicted of an offense by court-martial under AS 26.05 and confined under AS

26.05.405

shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner for the period of restraint or confinement as directed by the adjutant general.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 7, 2016, added (b). Although the 2016 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2016, under § 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until August 6, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendment was August 7, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 33.30.055.
Contraband articles into or out of prisons prohibited. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 11.56.375 and 11.56.380.]

Sec. 33.30.060.
Commissioner may contract for confinement and care of prisoners. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.061.
Commissioner to designate facility.

The commissioner shall designate the correctional facility to which a prisoner is to be committed to serve a term of imprisonment or period of temporary commitment. The commissioner may designate a facility without regard to whether it is maintained by the state, is located within the judicial district in which the prisoner was convicted, or is located in the state.

The commissioner may designate an out-of-state facility under this section only if the commissioner determines that rehabilitation or treatment of the prisoner will not be substantially impaired.

The commissioner may, under AS

33.30.065

, designate a prisoner to serve the prisoner’s term of imprisonment or period of temporary commitment, or a part of the term or period, by electronic monitoring. A prisoner serving a term of imprisonment, or a period of temporary commitment, for a crime involving domestic violence is not eligible for electronic monitoring.

A prisoner serving a term of imprisonment at a private residence as required by statute when electronic monitoring is not available does not have a liberty interest in that status. The commissioner may return the prisoner to a correctional facility if the commissioner finds that the prisoner has violated the terms and conditions of the imprisonment at the private residence.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 116 SLA 1998; am § 64 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For classification, see 22 AAC 5, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, added (d).

Sec. 33.30.062.
Contracts with privately operated facilities. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.065.
Service of sentence by electronic monitoring.

If the commissioner designates a prisoner to serve the prisoner’s term of imprisonment or period of temporary commitment, or a part of the term or period, by electronic monitoring, the commissioner shall direct the prisoner to serve the term or period at the prisoner’s residence or other place selected by the commissioner. The electronic monitoring shall be administered by the department or by a private contractor approved by the department under AS

33.30.011(a)(10)(B)

and shall be designed so that any attempt to remove, tamper with, or disable the monitoring equipment or to leave the place selected for the service of the term or period will result in a report or notice to the department.

In determining whether to designate a prisoner to serve a term of imprisonment or period of temporary commitment by electronic monitoring, the commissioner shall consider

safeguards to the public;

the prospects for the prisoner’s rehabilitation;

the availability of program and facility space;

the nature and circumstances of the offense for which the prisoner was sentenced or for which the prisoner is serving a period of temporary commitment;

the needs of the prisoner as determined by a classification committee and any recommendations made by the sentencing court;

the record of convictions of the prisoner, with particular emphasis on crimes specified in AS 11.41 or crimes involving domestic violence;

the use of drugs or alcohol by the prisoner; and

other criteria considered appropriate by the commissioner.

A decision by the commissioner to designate a prisoner to serve a term of imprisonment or a period of temporary confinement, or a part of the term or period, by electronic monitoring does not create a liberty interest in that status for the prisoner. The prisoner may be returned to a correctional facility at the discretion of the commissioner.

The commissioner may require a prisoner designated to serve a term of imprisonment or a period of temporary confinement by electronic monitoring to pay all or a portion of the costs of the electronic monitoring, but only if the prisoner has sufficient financial resources to pay the costs or a portion of the costs.

History.

(§ 5 ch 116 SLA 1998; am § 157 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “or by a private contractor approved by the department under AS

33.30.011(a)(10)(B)

” preceding “and shall be designed”.

Sec. 33.30.070.
Contracts with privately operated facilities. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.071.
Responsibility for prisoners pending commitment.

The commissioner is not responsible for providing custody, care, and discipline for a person detained under AS

47.30.705

or AS

47.37.170

unless the person is admitted into a state correctional facility.

The responsibility of the commissioner under AS

33.30.011

begins when a prisoner is accepted into the commissioner’s custody or admitted into a correctional facility.

Medical services for a prisoner who is unconscious or in immediate need of medical attention before admission to a correctional facility or commitment by a court to the custody of the commissioner of corrections shall be provided by the law enforcement agency having custody of the prisoner. The law enforcement agency may require the prisoner to compensate the agency for the cost or for a portion of the cost of medical services provided for any preexisting medical condition.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 70 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 92 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 49 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 70, SLA 1995, effective September 3, 1995, added a cross-reference to AS

33.30.028

to the former second sentence of subsection (a). However, since § 1, ch. 92, SLA 1995, had deleted that second sentence, effective July 1, 1995, the amendment made by § 14, ch. 70, SLA 1995 was not given effect.

Administrative Code. —

For emergency guards, see 13 AAC 62.

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 33.30.080.
Commissioner may lease state prison facility to political subdivision. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.081.
Transportation of prisoners.

The commissioner of public safety is responsible for transporting a prisoner to and from the court having jurisdiction over the prisoner and for delivering a prisoner to a correctional facility upon temporary or final commitment by a court or upon transfer of a prisoner from one correctional facility to another either inside or outside the state.

The commissioner of corrections shall make available return transportation to the place of arrest for a prisoner who is released from custody in a state correctional facility.

The commissioner of public safety shall make available return transportation to the place of arrest for a prisoner who is released from custody before admission to a state correctional facility.

The commissioner of corrections shall adopt regulations governing the furnishing of transportation, discharge payments, and clothing to prisoners upon release from a state correctional facility at any stage of a criminal proceeding.

Except as provided in (f) of this section or as necessary in a criminal action pending against the prisoner, a court may not order the transportation of a prisoner.

A court may order a prisoner who is a party or witness to a civil action or a witness to a criminal action to appear at a place other than within a correctional facility only if the court determines, after providing a reasonable opportunity for the commissioner to comment, that the prisoner’s personal appearance is essential to the just disposition of the action. In making its determination, the court shall consider available alternatives to the prisoner’s personal appearance including deposition and telephone testimony.

Except as provided in (h) of this section, the expenses associated with the transportation of a prisoner ordered under (f) of this section, including the costs of travel for the prisoner and escorting officers, and the salary and per diem costs of the escorting officers, shall be borne by the party who has requested the prisoner’s appearance, and shall be paid to the commissioner of public safety before the prisoner is transported.

A prisoner who is a party to a civil action is not required to bear the full costs of a prisoner’s own transportation under (g) of this section if the court determines that the prisoner is indigent. In these cases, the court may require the prisoner to bear a portion of the costs, and the commissioner of public safety shall bear the remaining costs of transporting the prisoner. If an indigent prisoner recovers a money judgment, the court may require the prisoner to bear all or part of the expenses required under (g) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For discharge, see 22 AAC 5, art. 9.

Sec. 33.30.090.
Commitment to commissioner. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.091.
Designation of programs.

Except as provided in AS

33.30.111

and

33.30.161

, the commissioner may assign a prisoner committed to the commissioner’s custody to a program established under AS

33.30.011(a)(3)

considering

safeguards to the public;

the prospects for the prisoner’s rehabilitation;

the availability of program and facility space;

the prospect of future judicial proceedings requiring the presence of the prisoner;

the nature and circumstances of the offense for which the prisoner was sentenced;

the needs of the prisoner as determined by a classification committee and any recommendations made by the sentencing court;

the record of convictions of the prisoner with particular emphasis on crimes specified in AS 11.41;

the use of drugs or alcohol by the prisoner;

the length of the prisoner’s sentence; and

other criteria considered appropriate by the commissioner, including experimental evaluation of correctional programs that are consistent with protection of the public and reformation of the prisoner.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, “AS

33.30.011(a)(3)

” was substituted for “AS

33.30.011

(3)” to reflect the addition of AS

33.30.011(b)

.

Sec. 33.30.095.
Duties of commissioner before release of prisoner.

The commissioner shall establish a program to prepare a prisoner who is serving a sentence of imprisonment exceeding one year for the prisoner’s discharge, release on parole or probation, or prerelease furlough under AS

33.30.111

that begins 90 days before the date of the prisoner’s discharge, release, or furlough.

The program established under (a) of this section must include

instruction on

obtaining state identification;

community resources available for housing, employment, and treatment;

an individualized reentry plan under AS

33.30.011(a)(9)

for the prisoner;

probation and parole orientation, if appropriate; and

a partnership with one or more nonprofit organizations to allow access to a prisoner before the prisoner’s discharge, release, or furlough to assist the prisoner with the prisoner’s application for Medicaid, social security benefits, public assistance under AS 47.25, and a state identification card or driver’s license and provide other programs to assist the prisoner’s transition into the community, promote rehabilitation, and reduce recidivism.

History.

(§ 158 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 190, ch. 36, SLA 2016 made this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 33.30.100.
Commissioner to designate facility. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.101.
Furloughs.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the granting of prerelease and short-duration furloughs to prisoners

to obtain counseling and treatment for alcohol or drug abuse;

to secure or attend vocational training;

to obtain medical or psychiatric treatment;

to secure or engage in employment;

to attend educational institutions;

to secure a residence or make other preparations for release;

to appear before a group whose purpose is a better understanding of crime or corrections; or

for any other rehabilitative purpose the commissioner determines to be in the interests of the prisoner and the public.

If the commissioner determines with reasonable probability that a prisoner can live under reduced supervision without violating the law or the conditions established for the conduct of the prisoner, the commissioner may grant a furlough after considering

the factors in AS

33.30.091

;

violations, if any, by the prisoner of a condition of a prior furlough;

the history, if any, of institutional misconduct by the prisoner; and

the best interests of the prisoner and the public.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section may not provide for the granting of a furlough of any type to a prisoner sentenced to a mandatory 99-year term of imprisonment under AS

12.55.125(a)

or a definite term of imprisonment under AS

12.55.125(l)

unless the prisoner is at all times in the direct custody of a correctional officer while the prisoner is away from the correctional facility.

The commissioner may release on furlough a prisoner convicted of a crime involving domestic violence only under conditions that would protect the victim of domestic violence or other household member.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 7 SLA 1996; am § 59 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (c). Relettered in 1996. In 2008, in subsection (a), “to” was moved from the end of the introductory language to follow each of paragraphs (a)(1) — (7) to maintain the grammatical structure.

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 33.30.110.
Commissioner may designate facility for service of temporary commitments or sentences of one year or less. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.111.
Prerelease furloughs.

Furlough programs established under AS

33.30.101

must include prerelease furloughs designed to facilitate the reintegration of a prisoner into society.

A facility that is specifically adapted to provide a residence outside prison, including a halfway house, group home, or other placement that provides varying levels of restriction and supervision, may be used for a prisoner on a prerelease furlough.

The restrictions and supervision required for a prerelease furlough shall provide safeguards that minimize risk to the public and include, as a minimum,

frequent contact with the prisoner by persons supervising the prisoner;

knowledge by supervisory staff of the location of the prisoner;

periodic reports by supervisory staff to the commissioner on the performance of the prisoner while on furlough; and

a residential setting in which persons supervising a prisoner are obliged to immediately report to the commissioner any violation of a condition set for the prisoner’s conduct.

Notwithstanding AS

33.30.101(b)

, and other eligibility criteria established by the commissioner that relate to risks to the public posed by the proposed furlough of a prisoner,

a prisoner sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of more than one year but less than five years is not eligible for a prerelease furlough until the prisoner has served at least one-third of the sentence; and

a prisoner sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of five years or more is not eligible for a prerelease furlough until the prisoner has served at least one-third of the sentence or is within three years of the release date, whichever is later.

A prisoner may request a prerelease furlough under procedures adopted by the commissioner. If the commissioner denies a request for a prerelease furlough, the commissioner shall provide the prisoner with a written explanation of the reasons for the denial.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, if the commissioner considers a prisoner convicted of a crime against a person or arson in the first degree for a prerelease furlough and the victim has requested notice under AS

33.30.013

, the commissioner shall send notice of intent to consider the prisoner for a prerelease furlough to the victim. The victim may comment in writing on the commissioner’s intent to release the prisoner on a prerelease furlough status. The commissioner shall consider the victim’s comments before making a final decision to release a prisoner on a prerelease furlough status. The commissioner shall make a reasonable effort to notify the victim of an intent to release the prisoner on a prerelease furlough. The notice must contain the expected date of the prisoner’s release, the geographic area in which the prisoner will reside, and other pertinent information concerning the prisoner’s release that may affect the victim.

If the commissioner considers a prisoner convicted of a crime involving domestic violence for a prerelease furlough, the commissioner shall send notice of intent to consider the prisoner for prerelease furlough to the last known address of the victim. The victim may comment in writing on the commissioner’s intention to release the prisoner on a prerelease furlough. The commissioner shall consider the victim’s comments, if any, before making a final decision to release the prisoner on a prerelease furlough. The commissioner shall make a reasonable effort to notify the victim of any decision to release the prisoner on the prerelease furlough. The notice must include the expected date of the furlough and any other information concerning the furlough that may affect the victim. A person may not bring a civil action for damages for a failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 21 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 60, 61 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 33.30.120.
Transfer of prisoners. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.121.
Short-duration furloughs.

A short-duration furlough is an authorized leave of absence from a correctional facility for a period not to exceed 12 hours at any one time, except for

family visitations, that may not exceed one week or occur more frequently than once in each four-month period; or

medical treatment, for which the furlough may not last longer than necessary for the treatment.

A short-duration furlough may be granted to a prisoner at any time under regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

On September 4, 1986, the commissioner of corrections obtained authority to contract for the placement of prisoners found guilty but not mentally ill into privately operated treatment facilities. July 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.30.130.
Duty of the commissioner of public safety to provide for persons pending commitment. [Repealed,
§ 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.131.
Prerelease or short duration furlough or correctional restitution center placement involving employment.

The commissioner may grant a prerelease or short-duration furlough to permit a prisoner to participate in suitable employment under conditions and at wages that represent the prevailing standard for the area. A prisoner may not participate in employment where an organized labor dispute is in progress.

Unless alternative arrangements are expressly approved by the commissioner, when a prisoner is employed outside a correctional facility as part of a prerelease or short-duration furlough program, or as part of serving time in a correctional restitution center under AS

33.30.151

—

33.30.181

, the earnings of the prisoner shall be delivered to the commissioner. If an employer transmits the earnings to the commissioner, the employer has no liability to the prisoner for the earnings. The commissioner shall disburse the earnings of the prisoner, in an order determined appropriate, under procedures adopted by the commissioner to

pay for the room, board, and personal expenses of the prisoner in an amount or at a rate determined by the commissioner;

pay any restitution or fine ordered by the sentencing court;

reimburse the state for an award made for violent crimes compensation under AS 18.67 arising out of the criminal conduct of the prisoner;

pay a civil judgment arising out of the criminal conduct of the prisoner; and

support the dependents of the prisoner, and to provide child support payments as required by AS 25.27.

After making the disbursements authorized under (b) of this section, the commissioner shall retain the balance remaining in the account of the prisoner and give it to the prisoner upon release. The commissioner may permit the prisoner to draw upon a portion of this money for other purposes that the commissioner considers appropriate.

Only the earnings retained by the commissioner under (c) of this section are subject to lien, attachment, garnishment, execution, or other proceedings to encumber money or property.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 32 ch 7 FSSLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 33.30.140.
Place of service of sentence by prisoner. [Repealed,
§ 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.141.
Effect of violation of furlough conditions or failure to return.

If, after a hearing, a prisoner on a furlough is found to have violated the conditions established for the prisoner’s conduct, the commissioner may immediately require the return of the prisoner to actual confinement for a period not to exceed the balance of the term of imprisonment or initiate disciplinary proceedings authorized by regulations adopted by the commissioner or both.

The failure of a prisoner on a furlough to return to the place of confinement or residence within the time specified by those having direct supervision over the prisoner is an unlawful evasion under AS

11.56.335

or

11.56.340

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 51 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 57 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 33.30.150.
Visitation privileges. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.151.
Correctional restitution centers.

The commissioner shall establish correctional restitution centers in the state. The purpose of the centers is to provide certain offenders with rehabilitation through comprehensive treatment for substance abuse, cognitive behavioral disorders, and other criminal risk factors, including aftercare support, community service, and employment, while protecting the community through partial incarceration of the offender, and to create a means to provide restitution to victims of crimes.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations setting standards for the operation of the centers including

requirements that the centers be secure and in compliance with state and local safety laws;

standards for disciplinary rules to be imposed on prisoners confined to the centers;

standards for the granting of emergency absence to prisoners confined to the centers;

standards for classifying prisoners to centers;

standards for mandatory employment and participation in community service programs in each center;

standards for periodic review of the performance of prisoners confined to the centers and quality assurance measures to ensure centers are meeting state standards and contractual obligations;

standards for the provision of treatment, including substance abuse treatment, cognitive behavioral therapy, and aftercare designed to address an offender’s individual criminogenic needs; and

standards and a process to assess an offender’s risk of recidivating and the criminal risk factors and needs that reduce the risk of recidivating and ensure that

high risk offenders with moderate to high needs are a priority for acceptance into a correctional restitution center; and

centers establish internal procedures to limit the mixing of low and high risk prisoners.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1988; am § 159 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “comprehensive treatment for substance abuse, cognitive behavioral disorders, and other criminal risk factors, including aftercare support,” following “rehabilitation through”, added “and quality assurance measures to ensure centers are meeting state standards and contractual obligations;” to the end of (b)(6); added (b)(7) and (8); and made a related change.

Sec. 33.30.160.
Transportation of prisoners. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.161.
Eligibility to serve time in a correctional restitution center.

The commissioner may not allow a prisoner to serve time in a correctional restitution center unless the commissioner specifically finds that the prisoner meets the eligibility requirements of this section.

To be eligible to serve time in a correctional restitution center, the prisoner

must be employable or eligible to work on community service projects approved by the commissioner and agree to secure employment or participate in community service projects and obey the rules of the center;

may not be serving a sentence for conviction of an offense

involving violence or the use of force;

under AS

11.41.320

,

11.41.330

, or AS

11.56.740

;

may not have been convicted of a felony offense, in the state or another jurisdiction, involving violence or the use of force;

may not have been convicted of an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

or an offense in the state or another jurisdiction having elements substantially identical to an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

; and

may not have been sentenced to a

mandatory 99-year term of imprisonment under AS

12.55.125(a)

; or

definite term of imprisonment under AS

12.55.125(l)

.

Unless the commissioner determines otherwise for good cause shown, a person sentenced to less than five days who is serving time in a correctional restitution center shall participate in a community service project when available.

In (b) of this section,

“force” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“violence or the use of force” includes possession of a firearm, as defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

, in the commission of an offense, whether or not the firearm was actually used.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am §§ 2, 3 ch 82 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 64 SLA 1991; am § 17 ch 7 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 33.30.170.
Expenses of prisoners to be paid by the department. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.171.
Community advisory committees.

The commissioner shall appoint a community advisory committee for each center, to consist of five members of the community in which the center is located. The committee shall act as a liaison between the community and the department regarding community concerns with the center.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Sec. 33.30.180.
Copy of commitment. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.181.
Confinement to the center.

A prisoner shall be confined to the center at all times except while

at work and traveling to and from work;

at and traveling to and from a community service project approved by the commissioner;

on emergency absence;

at and traveling to and from a job interview; or

on a furlough approved by the commissioner.

Except for an emergency absence or furlough, a prisoner may not be absent from a center under this section for more than 12 hours in a 24-hour period.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Secs. 33.30.185 — 33.30.190.
Transmission of criminal records and data to place of imprisonment. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]